Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF4412.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 13.601, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Residential addresses. new text end new text begin If the residential address of an elected official or a candidate for elected office is classified as public data under this chapter or another state law, a responsible authority may only provide the residential address upon written request. new text end